District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-522

Lessee’s right to goods on lessor’s insolvency.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and even though the goods have not been shipped, a lessee who has paid a part or all of the rent and security for goods identified to a lease contract (§ 28:2A-217) on making and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of the rent and security due under the lease contract may recover the goods identified from the lessor if the lessor becomes insolvent within 10 days after receipt of the first installment of rent and security.

(b)

A lessee acquires the right to recover goods identified to a lease contract only if they conform to the lease contract.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-522.
This section is referenced in § 28:2A-508.

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Receipt”. Section 2-103(1)(c).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Insolvent”. Section 1-201(23).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

Definitional Cross References: “Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-502.